Tennessee, session 114, HB1400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 33, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department shall develop and implement a suicide prevention program.
(b) The program must:
(1) Support upstream comprehensive community-based suicide
prevention;
(2) Conduct positive interventions with persons who have threatened or
attempted suicide;
(3) Partner with local organizations to implement such program in
communities;
(4) Conduct research on suicide rates among diverse populations;
(5) Conduct research on how to reduce the access of lethal means
among persons at risk of suicide; and
(6) Implement postvention support for a person who has attempted
suicide and for such person's family.
(c) The department is encouraged to collaborate with qualified mental health
professionals in the development and implementation of this program.
(d) On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to
the health and welfare committee of the senate and the committee of the house of
HB1400
003053
- 1 -

representatives having jurisdiction over health-related matters on this program and any
suggestions from the department based upon the research conducted from the previous
calendar year.
(e) The department is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this section.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. For the purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon
becoming law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1,
2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003053